Hawaii statutes.
§27G-3 Access Hawaii
committee; establishment; membership; chairperson. (a) There is
established within the department of accounting and general services, the
access Hawaii committee.

(b) The committee shall consist of not more
than fifteen voting, ex officio members, or their designated representatives,
as follows:

(1) The comptroller;

(2) The administrator of the state procurement
office;

(3) The director of the office of information
practices;

(4) The directors of not more than three government
agencies using or planning to use the services of the portal manager;

(5) The administrative director of the courts;

(6) A representative of the Hawaii state senate
appointed by the president of the senate;

(7) A representative of the Hawaii state house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(8) The chief information officers of the four
counties; and

(9) The chief information officer.

(c) The chief information officer or the chief
information officer's designee shall serve as the chairperson of the committee.
[L 2007, c 172, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 21, §1; am L 2016, c 58, §4]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next